Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1115.01
Investigation or other proceeding;
prohibited acts.

It
shall be unlawful for any person with respect to any investigation or other
proceeding under the Securities Act of Nebraska to: (1) Alter, destroy, mutilate,
or conceal; (2) make a false entry in or by any means falsify; or (3) remove
from any place or withhold from investigators or officials any record, document,
or electronic or physical evidence with the intent to impede, obstruct, avoid,
evade, or influence the investigation or administration of any other proceeding
under the act.

Laws 2009, LB113, § 2.